apertium-scn.scn.dix
       <pardef n="batt/iri__vblex">
      	<e><p><l>iri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>ìri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Presento de Indicativo  -->
    	<e><p><l>u</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>emu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>inu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	 <!-- Imperativo -->
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>issi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>emu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìssiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>issiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ìssi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>èmu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ìssiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
        <e r="LR"><p><l>issi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>emu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>issiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>


    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ivi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ianu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	 <!-- Two alternative forms: with "eva" and with "iva". Forms without accent accepted.  -->
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>evi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>èvamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìvamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>èvavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìvavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>èvanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìvanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>evamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>evavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>evanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Pretérito de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>ivi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>isti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>emmu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>emu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìstivu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>istivu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>istu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>èrunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>enu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>eru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Futuro Simple -->
    	<e><p><l>irò</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrò</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irai</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrai</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irà</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrà</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iremu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irremu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iriti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irriti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>irannu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>irrannu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Presente de Subjuntivo falta en Siciliano -->

    <e lm="ammenniri"><i>ammenn</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="canùsciri" r="LR"><p><l>canusc</l><r>canùsc</r></p><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pidiri"><i>pid</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dividiri"><i>divid</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="distinchiri"><i>distinch</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="curpiri"><i>curp</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abbabbasuniri"><i>abbabbasun</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cogliri"><i>cogl</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="allaschiri"><i>allasch</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ascediri"><i>asced</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunchiri"><i>cunch</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faguriri" r="LR"><p><l>arri</l><r>fagur</r></p><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mbadducchiri"><i>mbadducch</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mmudurriri"><i>mmudurr</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ncazzuliri"><i>ncazzul</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ncucchiri"><i>ncucch</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nsavaniri"><i>nsavan</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ntinturiri" r="LR"><p><l>ntintiridd</l><r>ntintur</r></p><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utteniri" r="LR"><p><l>otten</l><r>utten</r></p><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sbidiri"><i>sbid</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="suffrijiri"><i>suffrij</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="valiri"><i>val</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="liiri"><i>li</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iapriri" r="LR"><p><l>japr</l><r>iapr</r></p><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunfunniri"><i>cunfunn</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pirsiguiri" r="LR"><p><l>pirsegu</l><r>pirsigu</r></p><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ambiri"><i>amb</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abbelliri"><i>abbell</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="affitiri"><i>affit</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="antividiri"><i>antivid</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arricchiri"><i>arricch</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="attrairi"><i>attra</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cerniri"><i>cern</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="conferiri"><i>confer</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cucediri"><i>cuced</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumpatiri"><i>cumpat</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunsintiri"><i>cunsint</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="curreggiri"><i>curregg</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deperiri"><i>deper</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dimagriri"><i>dimagr</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dissuadiri"><i>dissuad</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="durmiri"><i>durm</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="espandiri"><i>espand</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="garantiri"><i>garant</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indulgiri"><par n="in/n"/><i>dulg</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inumidiri"><par n="in/n"/><i>umid</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mmurdiri"><i>mmurd</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ocidiri"><par n="o/u"/><i>cid</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poniri"><i>pon</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="proibbiri"><i>proibb</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="resolviri"><i>resolv</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rimettiri"><par n="ri/re"/><i>mett</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saicciri"><i>saicc</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sepelliri"><i>sepell</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stabiliri"><i>stabil</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="surbiri"><i>surb</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tinniri"><i>tinn</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dispiaciri"><i>dispiac</i><par n="batt/iri__vblex"/></e>
